Maryland, session 2026, HB1291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–160.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING A
PROCEDURE TO PROVIDE FOR THE TEMPORARY CONTINUATION OF SERVICES TO
MAINTAIN THE CONTINUITY OF CARE OF A PROGRAM RECIPIENT:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1291*

HOUSE BILL 1291
(1) WHO:
(I) IS AT LEAST 65 YEARS OLD;
(II) HAS RECEIVED IN–HOME SERVICES UNDER A PROGRAM
ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 6
MONTHS; AND
(III) HAS EXPERIENCED OR IS ABOUT TO EXPERIENCE AN
INTERRUPTION OF SERVICES DUE TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE ERROR OR A TECHNICAL
ISSUE EXPERIENCED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) ABOUT WHOM THE DEPARTMENT HAS BEEN ALERTED OF THE
ADMINISTRATIVE ERROR OR TECHNICAL ISSUE BY A CASE MANAGER OR CARE
PLANNER WHO HAS:
(I) A RELATIONSHIP WITH THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT; AND
(II) FAMILIARITY WITH THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT’S HISTORY.
(B) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR THE TEMPORARY CONTINUATION OF SERVICES
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, A PROGRAM RECIPIENT SHALL TAKE
STEPS TO RESOLVE THE ADMINISTRATIVE ERROR OR TECHNICAL ISSUE INCLUDING,
AS APPROPRIATE:
(1) FILING AN APPEAL;
(2) REQUESTING A HEARING; OR
(3) REAPPLYING FOR COVERAGE IN ACCORDANCE WITH STATE AND
FEDERAL RULES AND REGULATIONS.
(C) (1) A TEMPORARY CONTINUATION OF SERVICES UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BEGIN ON THE FIRST DAY THAT A PROGRAM RECIPIENT FACES A
LOSS OF SERVICES AND CONTINUE FOR UP TO 52 CONSECUTIVE DAYS, OR 1,248
SERVICE HOURS, WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST.
(2) THE SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER A TEMPORARY CONTINUATION
MAY BE ONLY THE SERVICES FOR WHICH THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT WAS
PREVIOUSLY APPROVED.
(D) THE PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY NOT:

HOUSE BILL 1291 3
(1) ALTER EXISTING APPEAL OR HEARING RIGHTS; OR
(2) AUTHORIZE THE DEPARTMENT TO BILL THE PROGRAM
RECIPIENT FOR SERVICES PROVIDED DURING THE TEMPORARY CONTINUATION OF
SERVICES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.